Illinois, session 104th, HB4275.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Code of Criminal Procedure of 1963 is 5amended by changing Section 110-6.1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 5/110-6.1)  (from Ch. 38, par. 110-6.1)7    Sec. 110-6.1. Denial of pretrial release. 8    (a) Upon verified petition by the State, the court shall 9hold a hearing and may deny a defendant pretrial release only 10if:11        (1) the defendant is charged with a felony offense 12    other than a forcible felony for which, based on the 13    charge or the defendant's criminal history, a sentence of 14    imprisonment, without probation, periodic imprisonment, or 15    conditional discharge, is required by law upon conviction, 16    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release 17    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 18    or persons or the community, based on the specific 19    articulable facts of the case;20        (1.5) (blank); the defendant's pretrial release poses 21    a real and present threat to the safety of any person or 22    persons or the community, based on the specific 23    articulable facts of the case, and the defendant is   HB4275- 2 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    charged with a forcible felony, which as used in this 2    Section, means treason, first degree murder, second degree 3    murder, predatory criminal sexual assault of a child, 4    aggravated criminal sexual assault, criminal sexual 5    assault, armed robbery, aggravated robbery, robbery, 6    burglary where there is use of force against another 7    person, residential burglary, home invasion, vehicular 8    invasion, aggravated arson, arson, aggravated kidnaping, 9    kidnaping, aggravated battery resulting in great bodily 10    harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, or any 11    other felony which involves the threat of or infliction of 12    great bodily harm or permanent disability or 13    disfigurement; 14        (2) (blank); the defendant is charged with stalking or 15    aggravated stalking, and it is alleged that the 16    defendant's pre-trial release poses a real and present 17    threat to the safety of a victim of the alleged offense, 18    and denial of release is necessary to prevent fulfillment 19    of the threat upon which the charge is based;20        (3) the defendant is charged with a violation of an 21    order of protection issued under Section 112A-14 of this 22    Code or Section 214 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act 23    of 1986, a stalking no contact order under Section 80 of 24    the Stalking No Contact Order Act, or a civil no contact 25    order under Section 213 of the Civil No Contact Order Act, 26    and it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release   HB4275- 3 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    poses a real and present threat to the safety of any person 2    or persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case;4        (4) the defendant is charged with misdemeanor domestic 5    battery or aggravated domestic battery under Section 6    12-3.2 or 12-3.3 of the Criminal Code of 2012 and it is 7    alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real 8    and present threat to the safety of any person or persons 9    or the community, based on the specific articulable facts 10    of the case;11        (5) the defendant is charged with any offense under 12    Article 11 of the Criminal Code of 2012, except for 13    Sections 11-14, 11-14.1, 11-18, 11-20, 11-30, 11-35, 14    11-40, and 11-45 of the Criminal Code of 2012, or similar 15    provisions of the Criminal Code of 1961 and it is alleged 16    that the defendant's pretrial release poses a real and 17    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 18    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 19    the case; 20        (6) the defendant is charged with a violation of 21    Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code (driving under 22    the influence) any of the following offenses under the 23    Criminal Code of 2012, and it is alleged that the 24    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 25    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 26    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the   HB4275- 4 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    case; :2            (A) Section 24-1.2 (aggravated discharge of a 3        firearm);4            (B) Section 24-1.2-5 (aggravated discharge of a 5        machine gun or a firearm equipped with a device 6        designed or used for silencing the report of a 7        firearm);8            (C) Section 24-1.5 (reckless discharge of a 9        firearm);10            (D) Section 24-1.7 (unlawful possession of a 11        firearm by a repeat felony offender);12            (E) Section 24-2.2 (manufacture, sale, or transfer 13        of bullets or shells represented to be armor piercing 14        bullets, dragon's breath shotgun shells, bolo shells, 15        or flechette shells);16            (F) Section 24-3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 17        firearms);18            (G) Section 24-3.3 (unlawful sale or delivery of 19        firearms on the premises of any school);20            (H) Section 24-34 (unlawful sale of firearms by 21        liquor license);22            (I) Section 24-3.5 (unlawful purchase of a 23        firearm);24            (J) Section 24-3A (gunrunning);25            (K) Section 24-3B (firearms trafficking);26            (L) Section 10-9 (b) (involuntary servitude);  HB4275- 5 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1            (M) Section 10-9 (c) (involuntary sexual servitude 2        of a minor);3            (N) Section 10-9(d) (trafficking in persons);4            (O) Non-probationable violations: (i) unlawful 5        possession of weapons by felons or persons in the 6        Custody of the Department of Corrections facilities 7        (Section 24-1.1), (ii) aggravated unlawful possession 8        of a weapon (Section 24-1.6), or (iii) aggravated 9        possession of a stolen firearm (Section 24-3.9); 10            (P) Section 9-3 (reckless homicide and involuntary 11        manslaughter);12            (Q) Section 19-3 (residential burglary);13            (R) Section 10-5 (child abduction);14            (S) Felony violations of Section 12C-5 (child 15        endangerment);16            (T) Section 12-7.1 (hate crime); 17            (U) Section 10-3.1 (aggravated unlawful 18        restraint); 19            (V) Section 12-9 (threatening a public official); 20            (W) Subdivision (f)(1) of Section 12-3.05 21        (aggravated battery with a deadly weapon other than by 22        discharge of a firearm); 23        (6.5) (blank); the defendant is charged with any of 24    the following offenses, and it is alleged that the 25    defendant's pretrial release poses a real and present 26    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the   HB4275- 6 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 2    case: 3            (A) Felony violations of Sections 3.01, 3.02, or 4        3.03 of the Humane Care for Animals Act (cruel 5        treatment, aggravated cruelty, and animal torture);6            (B) Subdivision (d)(1)(B) of Section 11-501 of the 7        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 8        influence while operating a school bus with 9        passengers);10            (C) Subdivision (d)(1)(C) of Section 11-501 of the 11        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 12        influence causing great bodily harm);13            (D) Subdivision (d)(1)(D) of Section 11-501 of the 14        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 15        influence after a previous reckless homicide 16        conviction);17            (E) Subdivision (d)(1)(F) of Section 11-501 of the 18        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 19        influence leading to death); or20            (F) Subdivision (d)(1)(J) of Section 11-501 of the 21        Illinois Vehicle Code (aggravated driving under the 22        influence that resulted in bodily harm to a child 23        under the age of 16);24        (7) the defendant is charged with an attempt to commit 25    any charge listed in paragraphs (1) through (5) (6.5), and 26    it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial release poses   HB4275- 7 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    a real and present threat to the safety of any person or 2    persons or the community, based on the specific 3    articulable facts of the case; or 4        (8) the person has a high likelihood of willful flight 5    to avoid prosecution and is charged with a felony; or6        (9) the defendant has been convicted of 2 or more of 7    the same felonies or misdemeanors and either: 8            (A) it is alleged that the defendant's pretrial 9        release poses a real and present threat to the safety 10        of any person or persons or the community, based on the 11        specific articulable facts of the case; or 12            (B) the defendant has a high likelihood of willful 13        flight to avoid prosecution. :14            (A) Any felony described in subdivisions (a)(1) 15        through (a)(7) of this Section; or16            (B) A felony offense other than a Class 4 offense. 17    (b) If the charged offense is a felony, as part of the 18detention hearing, the court shall determine whether there is 19probable cause the defendant has committed an offense, unless 20a hearing pursuant to Section 109-3 of this Code has already 21been held or a grand jury has returned a true bill of 22indictment against the defendant. If there is a finding of no 23probable cause, the defendant shall be released. No such 24finding is necessary if the defendant is charged with a 25misdemeanor.26    (c) Timing of petition.   HB4275- 8 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1        (1) A petition may be filed without prior notice to 2    the defendant at the first appearance before a judge, or 3    within the 21 calendar days, except as provided in Section 4    110-6, after arrest and release of the defendant upon 5    reasonable notice to defendant; provided that while such 6    petition is pending before the court, the defendant if 7    previously released shall not be detained.8        (2) Upon filing, the court shall immediately hold a 9    hearing on the petition unless a continuance is requested. 10    If a continuance is requested and granted, the hearing 11    shall be held within 48 hours of the defendant's first 12    appearance if the defendant is charged with first degree 13    murder or a Class X, Class 1, Class 2, or Class 3 felony, 14    and within 24 hours if the defendant is charged with a 15    Class 4 or misdemeanor offense. The Court may deny or 16    grant the request for continuance. If the court decides to 17    grant the continuance, the Court retains the discretion to 18    detain or release the defendant in the time between the 19    filing of the petition and the hearing.20    (d) Contents of petition.21        (1) The petition shall be verified by the State and 22    shall state the grounds upon which it contends the 23    defendant should be denied pretrial release, including the 24    real and present threat to the safety of any person or 25    persons or the community, based on the specific 26    articulable facts or flight risk, as appropriate.  HB4275- 9 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1        (2) If the State seeks to file a second or subsequent 2    petition under this Section, the State shall be required 3    to present a verified application setting forth in detail 4    any new facts not known or obtainable at the time of the 5    filing of the previous petition.6    (e) Eligibility: All defendants shall be presumed eligible 7for pretrial release, and the State shall bear the burden of 8proving by a preponderance of the clear and convincing 9evidence that:10        (1) the proof is evident or the presumption great that 11    the defendant has committed an offense listed in 12    subsection (a), and13        (2) for offenses listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) 14    of subsection (a), the defendant poses a real and present 15    threat to the safety of any person or persons or the 16    community, based on the specific articulable facts of the 17    case, by conduct which may include, but is not limited to, 18    a forcible felony, the obstruction of justice, 19    intimidation, injury, or abuse as defined by paragraph (1) 20    of Section 103 of the Illinois Domestic Violence Act of 21    1986, and22        (3) no condition or combination of conditions set 23    forth in subsection (b) of Section 110-10 of this Article 24    can mitigate (i) the real and present threat to the safety 25    of any person or persons or the community, based on the 26    specific articulable facts of the case, for offenses   HB4275- 10 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    listed in paragraphs (1) through (7) of subsection (a), or 2    (ii) the defendant's willful flight for offenses listed in 3    paragraph (8) of subsection (a), and4        (4) for offenses under subsection (b) of Section 407 5    of the Illinois Controlled Substances Act that are subject 6    to paragraph (1) of subsection (a), no condition or 7    combination of conditions set forth in subsection (b) of 8    Section 110-10 of this Article can mitigate the real and 9    present threat to the safety of any person or persons or 10    the community, based on the specific articulable facts of 11    the case, and the defendant poses a serious risk to not 12    appear in court as required.13    (f) Conduct of the hearings.14        (1) Prior to the hearing, the State shall tender to 15    the defendant copies of the defendant's criminal history 16    available, any written or recorded statements, and the 17    substance of any oral statements made by any person, if 18    relied upon by the State in its petition, and any police 19    reports in the prosecutor's possession at the time of the 20    hearing.21        (2) The State or defendant may present evidence at the 22    hearing by way of proffer based upon reliable information.23        (3) The defendant has the right to be represented by 24    counsel, and if he or she is indigent, to have counsel 25    appointed for him or her. The defendant shall have the 26    opportunity to testify, to present witnesses on his or her   HB4275- 11 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    own behalf, and to cross-examine any witnesses that are 2    called by the State. Defense counsel shall be given 3    adequate opportunity to confer with the defendant before 4    any hearing at which conditions of release or the 5    detention of the defendant are to be considered, with an 6    accommodation for a physical condition made to facilitate 7    attorney/client consultation. If defense counsel needs to 8    confer or consult with the defendant during any hearing 9    conducted via a 2-way audio-visual communication system, 10    such consultation shall not be recorded and shall be 11    undertaken consistent with constitutional protections. 12        (3.5) A hearing at which pretrial release may be 13    denied must be conducted in person (and not by way of 2-way 14    audio visual communication) unless the accused waives the 15    right to be present physically in court, the court 16    determines that the physical health and safety of any 17    person necessary to the proceedings would be endangered by 18    appearing in court, or the chief judge of the circuit 19    orders use of that system due to operational challenges in 20    conducting the hearing in person. Such operational 21    challenges must be documented and approved by the chief 22    judge of the circuit, and a plan to address the challenges 23    through reasonable efforts must be presented and approved 24    by the Administrative Office of the Illinois Courts every 25    6 months. 26        (4) If the defense seeks to compel the complaining   HB4275- 12 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    witness to testify as a witness in its favor, it shall 2    petition the court for permission. When the ends of 3    justice so require, the court may exercise its discretion 4    and compel the appearance of a complaining witness. The 5    court shall state on the record reasons for granting a 6    defense request to compel the presence of a complaining 7    witness only on the issue of the defendant's pretrial 8    detention. In making a determination under this Section, 9    the court shall state on the record the reason for 10    granting a defense request to compel the presence of a 11    complaining witness, and only grant the request if the 12    court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the 13    defendant will be materially prejudiced if the complaining 14    witness does not appear. Cross-examination of a 15    complaining witness at the pretrial detention hearing for 16    the purpose of impeaching the witness' credibility is 17    insufficient reason to compel the presence of the witness. 18    In deciding whether to compel the appearance of a 19    complaining witness, the court shall be considerate of the 20    emotional and physical well-being of the witness. The 21    pre-trial detention hearing is not to be used for purposes 22    of discovery, and the post arraignment rules of discovery 23    do not apply. The State shall tender to the defendant, 24    prior to the hearing, copies, if any, of the defendant's 25    criminal history, if available, and any written or 26    recorded statements and the substance of any oral   HB4275- 13 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    statements made by any person, if in the State's 2    Attorney's possession at the time of the hearing. 3        (5) The rules concerning the admissibility of evidence 4    in criminal trials do not apply to the presentation and 5    consideration of information at the hearing. At the trial 6    concerning the offense for which the hearing was conducted 7    neither the finding of the court nor any transcript or 8    other record of the hearing shall be admissible in the 9    State's case-in-chief, but shall be admissible for 10    impeachment, or as provided in Section 115-10.1 of this 11    Code, or in a perjury proceeding.12        (6) The defendant may not move to suppress evidence or 13    a confession, however, evidence that proof of the charged 14    crime may have been the result of an unlawful search or 15    seizure, or both, or through improper interrogation, is 16    relevant in assessing the weight of the evidence against 17    the defendant.18        (7) Decisions regarding release, conditions of 19    release, and detention prior to trial must be 20    individualized, and no single factor or standard may be 21    used exclusively to order detention. Risk assessment tools 22    may not be used as the sole basis to deny pretrial release. 23    (g) Factors to be considered in making a determination of 24dangerousness. The court may, in determining whether the 25defendant poses a real and present threat to the safety of any 26person or persons or the community, based on the specific   HB4275- 14 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1articulable facts of the case, consider, but shall not be 2limited to, evidence or testimony concerning:3        (1) The nature and circumstances of any offense 4    charged, including whether the offense is a crime of 5    violence, involving a weapon, or a sex offense.6        (2) The history and characteristics of the defendant 7    including:8            (A) Any evidence of the defendant's prior criminal 9        history indicative of violent, abusive, or assaultive 10        behavior, or lack of such behavior. Such evidence may 11        include testimony or documents received in juvenile 12        proceedings, criminal, quasi-criminal, civil 13        commitment, domestic relations, or other proceedings.14            (B) Any evidence of the defendant's psychological, 15        psychiatric or other similar social history which 16        tends to indicate a violent, abusive, or assaultive 17        nature, or lack of any such history.18        (3) The identity of any person or persons to whose 19    safety the defendant is believed to pose a threat, and the 20    nature of the threat.21        (4) Any statements made by, or attributed to the 22    defendant, together with the circumstances surrounding 23    them.24        (5) The age and physical condition of the defendant.25        (6) The age and physical condition of any victim or 26    complaining witness.   HB4275- 15 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1        (7) Whether the defendant is known to possess or have 2    access to any weapon or weapons.3        (8) Whether, at the time of the current offense or any 4    other offense or arrest, the defendant was on probation, 5    parole, aftercare release, mandatory supervised release, 6    or other release from custody pending trial, sentencing, 7    appeal, or completion of sentence for an offense under 8    federal or State law.9        (9) Any other factors, including those listed in 10    Section 110-5 of this Article deemed by the court to have a 11    reasonable bearing upon the defendant's propensity or 12    reputation for violent, abusive, or assaultive behavior, 13    or lack of such behavior.14    (h) Detention order. The court shall, in any order for 15detention:16        (1) make a written finding summarizing the court's 17    reasons for concluding that the defendant should be denied 18    pretrial release, including why less restrictive 19    conditions would not avoid a real and present threat to 20    the safety of any person or persons or the community, 21    based on the specific articulable facts of the case, or 22    prevent the defendant's willful flight from prosecution;23        (2) direct that the defendant be committed to the 24    custody of the sheriff for confinement in the county jail 25    pending trial;26        (3) direct that the defendant be given a reasonable   HB4275- 16 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1    opportunity for private consultation with counsel, and for 2    communication with others of his or her choice by 3    visitation, mail and telephone; and4        (4) direct that the sheriff deliver the defendant as 5    required for appearances in connection with court 6    proceedings.7    (i) Detention. If the court enters an order for the 8detention of the defendant pursuant to subsection (e) of this 9Section, the defendant shall be brought to trial on the 10offense for which he is detained within 90 days after the date 11on which the order for detention was entered. If the defendant 12is not brought to trial within the 90-day period required by 13the preceding sentence, he shall not be denied pretrial 14release. In computing the 90-day period, the court shall omit 15any period of delay resulting from a continuance granted at 16the request of the defendant and any period of delay resulting 17from a continuance granted at the request of the State with 18good cause shown pursuant to Section 103-5.19    (i-5) At each subsequent appearance of the defendant 20before the court, the judge must find that continued detention 21is necessary to avoid a real and present threat to the safety 22of any person or persons or the community, based on the 23specific articulable facts of the case, or to prevent the 24defendant's willful flight from prosecution. 25    (j) Rights of the defendant. The defendant shall be 26entitled to appeal any order entered under this Section   HB4275- 17 -LRB104 16791 RLC 30200 b1denying his or her pretrial release.2    (k) Appeal. The State may appeal any order entered under 3this Section denying any motion for denial of pretrial 4release.5    (l) Presumption of innocence. Nothing in this Section 6shall be construed as modifying or limiting in any way the 7defendant's presumption of innocence in further criminal 8proceedings.9    (m) Interest of victims. 10        (1) Crime victims shall be given notice by the State's 11    Attorney's office of this hearing as required in paragraph 12    (1) of subsection (b) of Section 4.5 of the Rights of Crime 13    Victims and Witnesses Act and shall be informed of their 14    opportunity at this hearing to obtain a protective order. 15        (2) If the defendant is denied pretrial release, the 16    court may impose a no contact provision with the victim or 17    other interested party that shall be enforced while the 18    defendant remains in custody. 19(Source: P.A. 103-822, eff. 1-1-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.)